Georgia, session 2025_26, HB738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to the authority granted by Code Section 36-7-2.1 of the O.C.G.A., the office of
elected county surveyor of Butts County is hereby abolished. The governing authority of
Butts County shall appoint a qualified person to hold the office of county surveyor for a term
of one year from the date of appointment. Successors shall also be appointed for terms of
one year. Any person appointed county surveyor shall possess the qualifications specified
by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 36-7-2 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 738
- 1 -

LC 62 0131/AP
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 738
- 2 -